Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.263 is amended to read:
418.263. [There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund,
the Child-Caring Agencies Fund. The fund consists of moneys  received by the Department of Human
Services under ORS 418.998 (2) and such other  moneys as may be otherwise made available by law.
Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund. ] There is established in the General Fund
of the  State Treasury the Child-Caring Agencies Account. All moneys received by the De-
partment of Human Services under ORS  418.998 (2) and such other moneys as may be oth-
erwise made available by law shall be  paid into the State Treasury and credited to the
Child-Caring Agencies Account.  Moneys  in the [ fund] account  are continuously appropriated to
the department and must be used only for the administration and enforcement  of ORS 418.205 to
418.327, 418.470, 418.475, 418.950 to 418.970 or 418.992 to 418.998.
SECTION 2.  ORS 418.998 is amended to read:
418.998. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  all penalties recovered under
ORS 418.992 to 418.998 shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the General Fund.
(2) All penalties recovered under ORS 418.992 to 418.998 for violations of any provision of ORS
418.205 to 418.327, 418.470,  418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 shall be paid to the Department of Human
Services to be paid into the State Treasury and  credited to the Child-Caring Agencies [ Fund] Ac-
count.
Enrolled Senate Bill 93 (SB 93-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 4, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 93 (SB 93-INTRO) Page 2